District of Columbia statutes.
50-1704.01

Administration.

The Department of Transportation shall continue to serve as the lead agency in the administration of the Child Passenger Safety Fund and in coordinating the child safety seat program with the DCFEMS, MPD and DMV.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 5a
as added Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-212, § 2(c), 49 DCR 8137